Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5366XS (3) 91 lh/ns S.F. 2238 Section 1. Section 22.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. âOriginal government bodyâ means the 3 government body that created or originated a public record, 4 or that has primary responsibility for the maintenance, 5 classification, or confidentiality of the public record. 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. âSecondary lawful custodianâ means a 7 lawful custodian in physical possession of a public record 8 provided by an original government body. 9 Sec. 2. Section 22.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 10 following new subsection: 11 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. If a request to examine or copy a 12 public record is made to a secondary lawful custodian, the 13 secondary lawful custodian may defer the determination of 14 whether the public record is subject to examination and 15 copying to the original government body. Upon deferral, the 16 secondary lawful custodian shall promptly notify the requester 17 of the deferral and the identity of the original government 18 body. The secondary lawful custodian shall not be required 19 to independently determine whether the public record is 20 confidential or subject to disclosure. 21 Sec. 3. Section 22.8, subsection 4, Code 2026, is amended by 22 adding the following new paragraph: 23 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0e. To allow a secondary lawful custodian 24 to defer to the original government body under section 22.3, 25 subsection 3, for a determination under paragraph âcâ or âdâ . 26 A secondary lawful custodian acting in reasonable reliance on 27 the position or determination of the original government body 28 shall be deemed to be acting in good faith for purposes of this 29 chapter. 30 Sec. 4. Section 22.10, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 31 following new subsection: 32 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. A secondary lawful custodian shall not 33 be subject to injunctive relief, damages, attorney fees, or 34 costs ordered under this section for failing to disclose or for 35 -1- LSB 5366XS (3) 91 lh/ns 1/ 3 S.F. 2238 disclosing a public record when the secondary lawful custodian 1 acted in reasonable reliance on a determination, instruction, 2 or position taken by the original government body to comply 3 with or refuse the request made under this chapter. 4